Georgia, session 2025_26, HB172.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Part 6A of Article 7 of Chapter 3 of Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
relating to state veterinary education, is amended by revising Code Section 20-3-518.3,
relating to purchases of loans made for educational purposes to students who have completed
a veterinary medical degree program, as follows:
"20-3-518.3.
(a) The board may provide for the purchase of loans made to students or former students
who are residents of Georgia for educational purposes who have completed a program of
study in the field of doctor of veterinary medicine or its equivalent and are authorized to
practice veterinary medicine in this state, with services in the form of the practice of
H. B. 172 (SUB)
- 1 -

LC 61 0124S
veterinary medicine while residing in this state to be rendered as consideration for such
loan purchases.
(b) Only persons whose veterinary medicine practices in this state include food animal
specialties and have been practicing such specialties for ten years or less shall be eligible
for loan purchases under this part."
SECTION 2.
Said part is further amended by revising subsection (a) of Code Section 20-3-518.4, relating
to loan purchases granted to applicants based upon services rendered and limitations, as
follows:
"(a)(1) Persons whose applications are approved and enter into a loan purchase
agreement with the board, as provided by Code Section 20-3-518.3, shall receive a loan
purchase in a total amount to be determined by the board, but not exceeding $80,000.00
$90,000.00 per person, as provided by Code Section 20-3-518.3. The loan purchases
shall be paid in such manner as the board shall determine.
(2) The loan purchases to be granted to each applicant shall be based upon the condition
that the consideration for such loan purchases shall be services to be rendered by the
applicant after entering into a loan purchase agreement with the board by practicing his
or her profession in a board approved rural county in Georgia with a population of 35,000
50,000 or less according to the United States decennial census of 2010 2020 or any future
such census.
(3) For time served after entering into a loan purchase agreement with the board in
practicing his or her profession in such board approved location, the applicant shall
receive a loan purchase at a rate equivalent to $20,000.00 $22,500.00 per 12 months of
service; provided, however, that the total purchase amount shall not exceed the maximum
specified in paragraph (1) of this subsection."
H. B. 172 (SUB)
- 2 -

LC 61 0124S
SECTION 3.
Said part is further amended by revising Code Section 20-3-518.5, relating to contract and
cancellation, as follows:
"20-3-518.5.
(a) Each applicant before being granted a loan purchase shall enter into a contract with a
term of four consecutive years with the board agreeing to the terms and conditions upon
which the loan purchase is granted, including such terms and provisions as will carry out
the full purpose and intent of this part. It shall not be necessary for a contract enrollee to
reapply after entering into a contract; provided, however, that the board may require the
contract enrollee to provide an annual certification of continued compliance with this Code
section. No person shall be eligible to receive such award more than once during his or her
lifetime. The form of such contract shall be prepared and approved by the Attorney
General, and each contract shall be signed by the chairperson of the board and by the
applicant.
(b) The board shall have the authority to cancel the loan purchase contract of any applicant
at any time for any cause deemed sufficient by the board, provided that such authority shall
not be arbitrarily or unreasonably exercised."
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 172 (SUB)
- 3 -